Idaho, session 2025, H0355.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-714, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-714. APPLICATION -- DEFERRAL OF PROPERTY TAX. (1) A qualified
claimant, as defined in section 63-713(1)(a), Idaho Code, may elect, upon
the application for property tax relief filed under section 63-703, Idaho
Code, to defer payment of any property tax due, including delinquencies,
interest, late charges, costs, and fees, after application of all bene-
fits available under section 63-704, Idaho Code. A qualified claimant, as
defined in section 63-713(1)(b), Idaho Code, may apply for property tax
deferral under sections 63-712 through 63-721, Idaho Code. The state tax
commission shall prescribe the form and manner by which the election must be
made and may require that the application include information establishing
the outstanding balance of any encumbrances, proof of insurance of an amount
adequate for the amount of deferred tax and interest, and such other informa-
tion as the state tax commission reasonably determines to be necessary. The
state tax commission may require written or other proof of the encumbrances
or casualty insurance in such form as the state tax commission may determine.
(2) No application for deferral of property taxes shall be granted if:
(a) The application fails to show sufficient equity in that property;
or
(b) The application fails to show proof of insurance of an amount ade-
quate for the amount of the deferred tax and interest.
(3)(a) Applications for deferral of property taxes submitted after the
September deadline pursuant to section 63-715, Idaho Code, and before
December 31, shall be accepted and processed after January 1 of the fol-
lowing year with no interest or penalties accruing for the time period
between the application submission and the receipt by the county of re-
imbursement payment from the state tax commission pursuant to section
63-717, Idaho Code.
(b) Applications that include property tax delinquencies for more than
two (2) property tax years shall be submitted by the September deadline.
(4) For a qualified claimant who owes property taxes for one (1) or more
tax years, the deferral of property taxes provided in this section shall in-
clude in the deferral any outstanding balance owed in property taxes on the
property, including delinquencies, interest, late charges, costs, and fees.


(5) Nothing in this section shall preclude a qualified claimant from
applying for property tax deferral on qualified property in any subsequent
years.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.